New York, session 2025-2026, A7692.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6901 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. "Nursing student" shall mean any person either receiving an educa- 4 tion in nursing or who has completed an education in nursing within the 5 prior year, where completing such education in nursing may permit such 6 person to be granted licensure under this article in accordance with the 7 applicable commissioner's regulations. 8 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6913 to read 9 as follows: 10 § 6913. Vaccination by nursing students. 1. Any nursing student may, 11 pursuant to a patient specific order or a non-patient specific order 12 under sections sixty-nine hundred nine and sixty-five hundred twenty- 13 seven of this title while overseen or approved by the department of 14 health or local health departments and operated under the medical super- 15 vision of licensed physicians, licensed physician assistants, or certi- 16 fied nurse practitioners: (a) administering immunizations to prevent 17 influenza to patients two years of age or older; and (b) administering 18 immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis A, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03012-03-6 A. 7692--A 2 1 hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicella, 2 COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease and 3 medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis to patients 4 eighteen years of age or older; and (c) administering other immuniza- 5 tions in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utiliz- 6 ing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration 7 recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American 8 Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and 9 Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory Commit- 10 tee on Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or interna- 11 tionally recognized scientific organizations for patients eighteen years 12 of age or older if the commissioner of health in consultation with the 13 commissioner determines that an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely 14 administered by a licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of prac- 15 tice; and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission of a reportable 16 communicable disease that is prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a 17 recommended immunization for such patients who: (A) meet age require- 18 ments, (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) lack evidence of 19 past infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor or another indi- 20 cation in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, 21 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 22 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 23 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 24 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory 25 Committee on Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or 26 internationally recognized scientific organizations. 27 2. Prior to administering immunizations, a nursing student shall 28 receive training in the following areas, as determined by the commis- 29 sioner of health after consultation with the commissioner: 30 (a) techniques, indications, precautions, contraindications, infection 31 control practices; 32 (b) use of personal protective equipment sufficient to provide the 33 basic level of competence for such tasks; and 34 (c) a current certificate in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation, 35 which at a minimum must include a certification in basic cardiopulmonary 36 resuscitation by an online program that has received accreditation from 37 the American Nurses Credentialing Center, the Accreditation Council for 38 Pharmacy Education (ACPE), or the Accreditation Council for Continuing 39 Medical Education. 40 3. When a nursing student administers an immunization, they shall: 41 (a) report such administration to the department of health either 42 through the statewide immunization information system or the citywide 43 immunization registry under section twenty-one hundred sixty-eight of 44 the public health law; and 45 (b) prior to administering the immunization, inform the patient or, 46 where applicable, the person legally responsible for the patient, on the 47 importance of having a primary health care practitioner. 48 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 2168 of the public 49 health law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (iii) to read as 50 follows: 51 (iii) A nursing student, as defined in section sixty-nine hundred one 52 of the education law, who administers a vaccine pursuant to section 53 sixty-nine hundred thirteen of the education law to a person nineteen 54 years of age or older shall, with the consent of the patient, report all 55 such immunizations to the department in a format prescribed by the 56 commissioner within fourteen days of administration of such immuniza- A. 7692--A 3 1 tions. A nursing student, as defined in section sixty-nine hundred one 2 of the education law, who administers a vaccine pursuant to section 3 sixty-nine hundred thirteen of the education law to a person nineteen 4 years of age or older in the city of New York shall, with the consent of 5 the patient, report in a format prescribed by the city of New York 6 commissioner of health and mental hygiene, all such immunizations to the 7 citywide immunization registry. 8 § 4. Section 6527 of the education law is amended by adding a new 9 subdivision 7-b to read as follows: 10 7-b. A licensed physician may prescribe and order a patient specific 11 order or a non-patient specific order to a nursing student, as defined 12 in section sixty-nine hundred one of this title, pursuant to regulations 13 made by the commissioner, and consistent with the public health law, 14 for: (a) administering immunizations to prevent influenza to patients 15 two years of age or older; and (b) administering immunizations to 16 prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis A, hepatitis B, 17 human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicella, COVID-19, 18 meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease and medications 19 required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis to patients eighteen 20 years of age or older; and (c) administering other immunizations in 21 accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utilizing gener- 22 ally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommen- 23 dations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of 24 Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecolo- 25 gists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory Committee on 26 Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or internationally 27 recognized scientific organizations for patients eighteen years of age 28 or older if the commissioner of health in consultation with the commis- 29 sioner determines that an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely adminis- 30 tered by a licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of practice; 31 and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission of a reportable communica- 32 ble disease that is prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a recom- 33 mended immunization for such patients who: (A) meet age requirements, 34 (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) lack evidence of past 35 infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor or another indication 36 in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utilizing 37 generally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration 38 recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American 39 Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and 40 Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory Commit- 41 tee on Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or interna- 42 tionally recognized scientific organizations. 43 § 5. Section 6909 of the education law is amended by adding a new 44 subdivision 7-a to read as follows: 45 7-a. A certified nurse practitioner may prescribe and order a patient 46 specific order or a non-patient specific order to a nursing student 47 pursuant to regulations made by the commissioner, and consistent with 48 the public health law, for: (a) administering immunizations to prevent 49 influenza to patients two years of age or older; and (b) administering 50 immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis A, 51 hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicella, 52 COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease and 53 medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis to patients 54 eighteen years of age or older; and (c) administering other immuniza- 55 tions in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utiliz- 56 ing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration A. 7692--A 4 1 recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American 2 Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and 3 Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory Commit- 4 tee on Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or interna- 5 tionally recognized scientific organizations for patients eighteen years 6 of age or older if the commissioner of health in consultation with the 7 commissioner determines that an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely 8 administered by a licensed pharmacist within their lawful scope of prac- 9 tice; and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission of a reportable 10 communicable disease that is prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a 11 recommended immunization for such patients who: (A) meet age require- 12 ments, (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) lack evidence of 13 past infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor or another indi- 14 cation in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, 15 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 16 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 17 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 18 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory 19 Committee on Immunization Practices, or other similar nationally or 20 internationally recognized scientific organizations. 21 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.